District of Columbia statutes.
26-315

Change of location of business or area; other miscellaneous activity.

A licensee may make a written application, in the form prescribed by the Superintendent [Commissioner], to the Superintendent [Commissioner] for leave to change the licensee’s location of business, or in the case of a mobile unit, the area in which the mobile unit is authorized to be operated, stating the reasons for the proposed change. If the Superintendent [Commissioner] approves the application, the Superintendent [Commissioner] shall issue a revised license in accordance with this chapter, stating the new location of the licensee or, in the case of a mobile unit, the new area in which the mobile unit may be operated. The revised license shall be for the same term as the original license to which the Superintendent [Commissioner] made the requested change. The fee for a revised license due to a change of location of business or area shall be $50.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 16, 45 DCR 1782
1981 Ed., § 26-1115.